Hawaii statutes.
§701-104 Principles of construction.
The provisions of this Code cannot be extended by analogy so as to create
crimes not provided for herein; however, in order to promote justice and effect
the objects of the law, all of its provisions shall be given a genuine
construction, according to the fair import of the words, taken in their usual
sense, in connection with the context, and with reference to the purpose of the
provision. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1]

COMMENTARY ON §701-104

This section, read in conjunction with §701-103, is intended
to assure that this Code will be construed by the courts in such a way as to
effectuate the declared purposes of the law.

SUPPLEMENTAL COMMENTARY ON §701-104

Section 104 of the Proposed Draft of the Code read: "The
rule that a penal statute is to be strictly construed does not apply to this
Code, but the provisions herein must be construed according to the fair import
of their terms." The legislature found that such broad wording would
subject the Code to unwarranted argument and attempted to avoid this
possibility by revising the entire section. Through the section, as enacted,
the legislature sought to limit the scope of the fair import principle. See
Conference Committee Report No. 2 (1972). The committee report also states: "It
is the intent of the Committee that definitions of crimes are to be strictly
construed."

Case Notes

In Coray v. Ariyoshi, 54 H. 254, 506 P.2d 13 (1973), and
State v. Rackle, 55 H. 531, 523 P.2d 299 (1974), the court reiterated without
discussion the doctrine of strict construction. The offenses in each case
occurred prior to enactment of the Code.

Where words of general description follow enumeration of
specific things, the words are restricted to like objects. 56 H. 481, 541 P.2d
1020 (1975).

Rule of strict construction does not override other
fundamental rules of construction. 59 H. 456, 583 P.2d 337 (1978).

Proscription of distribution of lysergic acid "diethylamine"
under §329-14 (1974) cannot be extended by analogy to distribution of lysergic
acid diethylamide. 61 H. 74, 595 P.2d 288 (1979).

Cited in construing "accident". 1 H. App. 625, 623
P.2d 1271 (1981).

Cited in construing "possession". 8 H. App. 610,
822 P.2d 23 (1991).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next